Oklahoma, session 2025, SB69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.468 of Title 69, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The section of State Highway 102 beginning at the intersection


of East 990 Road extending north to the intersection of East


Memorial Road in Lincoln County shall be designated as the “SFC


Tomas L. Avey Bronze Star and Purple Heart Recipient Memorial


Highway”. The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable


permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-233 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:41:26 AM



Req. No. 233 Page 1